Illinois, session 104th, HB1907.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-208 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-208)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-208)7    Sec. 11-208. Powers of local authorities. 8    (a) The provisions of this Code shall not be deemed to 9prevent local authorities with respect to streets and highways 10under their jurisdiction and within the reasonable exercise of 11the police power from:12        1. Regulating the standing or parking of vehicles, 13    except as limited by Sections 11-1306 and 11-1307 of this 14    Act;15        2. Regulating traffic by means of police officers or 16    traffic control signals;17        3. Regulating or prohibiting processions or 18    assemblages on the highways; and certifying persons to 19    control traffic for processions or assemblages;20        4. Designating particular highways as one-way highways 21    and requiring that all vehicles thereon be moved in one 22    specific direction;23        5. Regulating the speed of vehicles in public parks   HB1907- 2 -LRB104 09224 LNS 19281 b1    subject to the limitations set forth in Section 11-604;2        6. Designating any highway as a through highway, as 3    authorized in Section 11-302, and requiring that all 4    vehicles stop before entering or crossing the same or 5    designating any intersection as a stop intersection or a 6    yield right-of-way intersection and requiring all vehicles 7    to stop or yield the right-of-way at one or more entrances 8    to such intersections;9        7. Restricting the use of highways as authorized in 10    Chapter 15;11        8. Regulating the operation of mobile carrying 12    devices, bicycles, low-speed electric bicycles, and 13    low-speed gas bicycles, and requiring the registration and 14    licensing of same, including the requirement of a 15    registration fee;16        9. Regulating or prohibiting the turning of vehicles 17    or specified types of vehicles at intersections;18        10. Altering the speed limits as authorized in Section 19    11-604;20        11. Prohibiting U-turns;21        12. Prohibiting pedestrian crossings at other than 22    designated and marked crosswalks or at intersections;23        13. Prohibiting parking during snow removal operation;24        14. Imposing fines in accordance with Section 25    11-1301.3 as penalties for use of any parking place 26    reserved for persons with disabilities, as defined by   HB1907- 3 -LRB104 09224 LNS 19281 b1    Section 1-159.1, or veterans with disabilities by any 2    person using a motor vehicle not bearing registration 3    plates specified in Section 11-1301.1 or a special decal 4    or device as defined in Section 11-1301.2 as evidence that 5    the vehicle is operated by or for a person with 6    disabilities or a veteran with a disability;7        15. Adopting such other traffic regulations as are 8    specifically authorized by this Code; or9        16. Enforcing the provisions of subsection (f) of 10    Section 3-413 of this Code or a similar local ordinance.11    (b) No ordinance or regulation enacted under paragraph 1, 124, 5, 6, 7, 9, 10, 11 or 13 of subsection (a) shall be 13effective until signs giving reasonable notice of such local 14traffic regulations are posted.15    (c) The provisions of this Code shall not prevent any 16municipality having a population of 500,000 or more 17inhabitants from prohibiting any person from driving or 18operating any motor vehicle upon the roadways of such 19municipality with headlamps on high beam or bright.20    (d) The provisions of this Code shall not be deemed to 21prevent local authorities within the reasonable exercise of 22their police power from prohibiting, on private property, the 23unauthorized use of parking spaces reserved for persons with 24disabilities.25    (e) No unit of local government, including a home rule 26unit, may enact or enforce an ordinance that applies only to   HB1907- 4 -LRB104 09224 LNS 19281 b1motorcycles if the principal purpose for that ordinance is to 2restrict the access of motorcycles to any highway or portion 3of a highway for which federal or State funds have been used 4for the planning, design, construction, or maintenance of that 5highway. No unit of local government, including a home rule 6unit, may enact an ordinance requiring motorcycle users to 7wear protective headgear. Nothing in this subsection (e) shall 8affect the authority of a unit of local government to regulate 9motorcycles for traffic control purposes or in accordance with 10Section 12-602 of this Code. No unit of local government, 11including a home rule unit, may regulate motorcycles in a 12manner inconsistent with this Code. This subsection (e) is a 13limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of 14the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home 15rule units of powers and functions exercised by the State.16    (e-5) A unit of local government, including a home rule 17unit, The City of Chicago may not enact an ordinance providing 18for a noise monitoring system upon any portion of its 19roadways. the roadway known as Lake Shore Drive. Twelve months 20after the installation of the noise monitoring system, and any 21time after the first report as the City deems necessary, the 22City of Chicago shall prepare a noise monitoring report with 23the data collected from the system and shall, upon request, 24make the report available to the public. For purposes of this 25subsection (e-5), "noise monitoring system" means an automated 26noise monitor capable of recording noise levels 24 hours per   HB1907- 5 -LRB104 09224 LNS 19281 b1day and 365 days per year with computer equipment or human 2review of the recorded footage sufficient to process the data.3    (e-10) A unit of local government, including a home rule 4unit, may not enact an ordinance prohibiting the use of 5Automated Driving System equipped vehicles on its roadways. 6Nothing in this subsection (e-10) shall affect the authority 7of a unit of local government to regulate Automated Driving 8System equipped vehicles for traffic control purposes. No unit 9of local government, including a home rule unit, may regulate 10Automated Driving System equipped vehicles in a manner 11inconsistent with this Code. For purposes of this subsection 12(e-10), "Automated Driving System equipped vehicle" means any 13vehicle equipped with an Automated Driving System of hardware 14and software that are collectively capable of performing the 15entire dynamic driving task on a sustained basis, regardless 16of whether it is limited to a specific operational domain. 17This subsection (e-10) is a limitation under subsection (i) of 18Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 19concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and functions 20exercised by the State. 21    (f) A municipality or county designated in Section 2211-208.6 may enact an ordinance providing for an automated 23traffic law enforcement system to enforce violations of this 24Code or a similar provision of a local ordinance and imposing 25liability on a registered owner or lessee of a vehicle used in 26such a violation.  HB1907- 6 -LRB104 09224 LNS 19281 b1    (g) A municipality or county, as provided in Section 211-1201.1, may enact an ordinance providing for an automated 3traffic law enforcement system to enforce violations of 4Section 11-1201 of this Code or a similar provision of a local 5ordinance and imposing liability on a registered owner of a 6vehicle used in such a violation. 7    (h) A municipality designated in Section 11-208.8 may 8enact an ordinance providing for an automated speed 9enforcement system to enforce violations of Article VI of 10Chapter 11 of this Code or a similar provision of a local 11ordinance.12    (i) A municipality or county designated in Section 1311-208.9 may enact an ordinance providing for an automated 14traffic law enforcement system to enforce violations of 15Section 11-1414 of this Code or a similar provision of a local 16ordinance and imposing liability on a registered owner or 17lessee of a vehicle used in such a violation. 18(Source: P.A. 100-209, eff. 1-1-18; 100-257, eff. 8-22-17; 19100-352, eff. 6-1-18; 100-863, eff. 8-14-18; 101-123, eff. 207-26-19.)